da: Kædetype for lynlås: Spirallynlås (nylon); Metal; Støbt plast (Vislon); Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de corrente do fecho de correr: Espiral (nylon); Metal; Plástico moldado (Vislon); Outro
th: แบบโซ่ซิป: ขด (ไนลอน); โลหะ; พลาสติกฉีดขึ้นรูป (Vislon); อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di catena della cerniera: Spirale (nylon); Metallo; Plastica stampata (Vislon); Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de lanț al fermoarului: Spiră (nailon); Metal; Plastic turnat (Vislon); Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta verige zadrge: Spirala (najlon); Kovina; Brizgana plastika (Vislon); Drugo
lt-LT: Užtrauktuko grandinėlės tipas: Spiralinis (nailoninis); Metalinis; Lieto plastiko („Vislon“); Kita
de: Typ der Reißverschlusskette: Spirale (Nylon); Metall; Kunststoffprofil (Vislon); Sonstige
tr: Fermuar zinciri tipi: Spiral (naylon); Metal; Kalıplanmış plastik (Vislon); Diğer
ja: ファスナーチェーンタイプ: コイル (ナイロン); メタル; 成形プラスチック (ビスロン); その他
zh-CN: 拉链类型: 螺旋（尼龙）; 金属; 注塑（Vislon）; 其他
el: Τύπος αλυσίδας με φερμουάρ: Σπιράλ (νάιλον); Μέταλλο; Χυτευτό πλαστικό (Vislon); Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta lanca za patentni zatvarač: Spirala (najlon); Metal; Lijevana plastika (Vislon); Ostalo
nb: Glidelåsens kjedetype: Spiral (nylon); Metall; Støpt plast (Vislon); Annet
cs: Typ zipového řetězu: Spirálový (nylon); Kovový; Tvarovaný plast (Vislon); Jiné
ko: 지퍼 체인 유형: 코일(나일론); 금속; 성형 플라스틱(비슬론); 기타
es: Tipo de cadena de la cremallera: Espiral (nailon); Metal; Plástico moldeado (Vislon); Otro
vi: Loại dây kéo: Dạng cuộn (nylon); Kim loại; Nhựa đúc (Vislon); Khác
en: Zipper chain type: Coil (nylon); Metal; Molded plastic (Vislon); Other
pt-BR: Zíper tipo de corrente: Espiral (nylon); Metal; Plástico injetado (Vislon); Outros
fi: Vetoketjun tyyppi: Spiraali (nailon); Metalli; Valettu muovi (Vislon); Muu
pl: Typ taśmy ząbkowej zamka błyskawicznego: Spiralny (nylon); Metalowy; Kostkowy (Vislon); Inne
hu: Cipzárlánc típusa: Spirál (nejlon); Fém; Öntött műanyag (Vislon); Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ zipsu s retiazkou: Špirálový (nylonový); Kovový; Tvarovaný plastový (Vislon); Iné
sv: Typ av kedja för dragkedja: Spiral (nylon); Metall; Gjuten plast (Vislon); Övrigt
zh-TW: 拉鍊鏈帶類型: 螺旋 (尼龍); 金屬; 塑鋼 (Vislon); 其他
bg-BG: Тип цип с верижка: Спирален (найлон); Метал; Лята пластмаса (Vislon); Други
ru: Тип цепи молнии: Витая (нейлон); Металлическая; Литая пластиковая (Vislon); Другая
fr: Type de chaîne de la fermeture éclair: Spirale (nylon); Métal; Plastique moulé (Vislon); Autre
nl: Ritssluiting met ketting: Spiraal (nylon); Metaal; Gegoten plastic (Vislon); Overig